Louisiana, session 2026, HB852.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:120.37(B) and 120.391 are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 47:120.341(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§120.37. Refund designation on tax form
* * *
B. Except as provided in R.S. 47:120.131, and 120.141, 120.341, and
120.391, when the total amount of tax refunds donated to any donee is less than ten
thousand dollars per year for two consecutive years, designation of such donee shall
be removed from the income tax form.
* * *
§120.341. Income tax checkoff; donation for Louisiana Coalition Against Domestic
Violence
* * *
D. Notwithstanding the limitations of R.S. 47:120.37(B), the designation of
the donee shall be reinstated for the tax year beginning on January 1, 2026.
Thereafter, if the total amount of tax refunds donated pursuant to this Section is less
than five thousand dollars per year for two consecutive years, the designation shall
be removed from the individual income tax return.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 852 ENROLLED
§120.391. Income tax checkoff; donation for Holden's Hope
A. For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2023, every individual
who files an individual income tax return for the current tax year and who is entitled
to a refund may designate on his current year return that all or any portion of the total
amount of the refund to which he is entitled shall be donated to Holden's Hope, in
lieu of that amount being paid to him as a refund, in which case the refund shall be
reduced by the amount so designated. The designation shall be made at the time of
the filing of the current year tax return and shall be made on the income tax return
form as prescribed by the secretary of the Department of Revenue. Donated monies
shall be administered by the secretary and distributed to Holden's Hope in
accordance with the provisions of R.S. 47:120.37. No donation made under the
provisions of this Section shall be invalid for lack of an authentic act.
B. Notwithstanding the limitations of R.S. 47:120.37(B), the designation of
the donee shall be reinstated for the tax year beginning on January 1, 2026.
Thereafter, if the total amount of tax refunds donated pursuant to this Section is less
than five thousand dollars per year for two consecutive years, the designation shall
be removed from the individual income tax return.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.